src/morphology/stems/subjunctions.lexc
LEXICON CStag 
+CS: # ;

LEXICON IMtag
+IM: # ;

LEXICON Subjunction
tí CStag ;
tá% ið CStag ; ! MWE?
ið CStag ; ! XXX check this.
at CStag ;
at IMtag ;
um CStag ;  !XXX sjálf um.
áðrenn CStag ; !XXX
meðan CStag ;
so% at CStag ;
sum CStag ;
vissi CStag ;
hóast CStag ;
tessvegna CStag ; !XXX
eins% og CStag ;
viss CStag ;
Jamen CStag ;
eftirsum CStag ;
